Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1501
Purpose of sections.

The purpose
of sections 37-1501 to 37-1510 is to establish procedures for the administration
of a deer donation program and to encourage hunters to harvest deer to donate
to a program to feed residents of Nebraska who are in need.

Laws 2012, LB928, § 5.